Utah statutes.
78B-5-702.   Taking of affidavits in another state.

An affidavit taken in another state or territory of the United States, to be used in this state, may be taken before a commissioner appointed by the governor of this state to take affidavits and depositions in another state or territory, or before any notary public in another state or territory, or before any judge or clerk of a court of record having a seal.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

